Illinois, session 104th, HB2937.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Illinois Inclusive Venture Investment Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds and 7declares: 8    (a) Illinois has a vibrant entrepreneurial ecosystem but 9lacks equitable access to capital for minority entrepreneurs, 10venture capital firms, and financial managers. 11    (b) Minority-owned financial management firms, such as 12Ariel Investments, face systemic barriers to accessing 13institutional portfolios despite proven track records of 14success. 15    (c) Programs such as Chicago's 1871, Discovery Partners 16Institute, and minority-owned financial firms play a crucial 17role in fostering entrepreneurship, innovation, and economic 18growth among underrepresented groups. 19    (d) This Act will drive equitable economic growth by 20ensuring significant institutional capital flows to 21minority-led startups, minority-owned venture capital firms, 22and minority-owned financial management firms.   HB2937- 2 -LRB104 11833 SPS 21923 b1    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act: 2    "Covered institution" means: 3        (1) public and private universities, colleges, and 4    institutions of higher education with endowments or 5    investment portfolios exceeding $50,000,000; 6        (2) museums, cultural centers, and nonprofit 7    organizations with endowments or investment portfolios 8    exceeding $25,000,000 or receiving cumulative State 9    funding or tax exemptions exceeding $1,000,000 annually; 10        (3) nonprofit hospitals and healthcare systems with 11    investment portfolios exceeding $50,000,000; and 12        (4) public pension funds or retirement systems of 13    State or local governments. 14    "Minority-led startup" means a business that: 15        (1) is headquartered in this State or has significant 16    operations in this State; and 17        (2) is at least 51% owned and controlled by one or more 18    minority persons, women, or persons with disabilities, as 19    those terms are defined in the Business Enterprise for 20    Minorities, Women, and Persons with Disabilities Act. 21    "Minority-owned financial manager" means a financial firm, 22asset manager, or investment manager that: 23        (1) is at least 51% owned by one or more minority 24    persons, women, or persons with disabilities, as those 25    terms are defined in the Business Enterprise for 26    Minorities, Women, and Persons with Disabilities Act; and   HB2937- 3 -LRB104 11833 SPS 21923 b1        (2) the management and daily business operations are 2    controlled by one or more of the owners described in 3    paragraph (1) of this definition. 4    "Minority-owned venture capital firm" means a financial 5firm or investment manager that: 6        (1) is at least 51% owned by one or more minority 7    persons, women, or persons with disabilities, as those 8    terms are defined in the Business Enterprise for 9    Minorities, Women, and Persons with Disabilities Act; and 10        (2) the management and daily business operations of 11    which are controlled by one or more of the owners 12    described in paragraph (1) of this definition. 13    "Special investment initiative" means a program, 14incubator, accelerator, or similar initiative that: 15        (1) provides resources, mentorship, training, or 16    capital to entrepreneurs who are minority persons, women, 17    or persons with disabilities, as those terms are defined 18    in the Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and 19    Persons with Disabilities Act; and 20        (2) operates in this State or primarily supports 21    businesses located in this State. 22    "Special Investment Initiative" includes, but is not 23limited to, university-led startup programs, nonprofit 24entrepreneurship accelerators, and private-sector incubators 25aimed at supporting underrepresented founders.   HB2937- 4 -LRB104 11833 SPS 21923 b1    Section 15. Investment requirements and incentives. 2    (a) The State Treasurer shall create a Direct Matching 3Funds Program. The purpose of the program shall be to leverage 4State-managed funds for investments in minority-owned venture 5capital firms, minority-owned financial managers, and 6minority-led startups. 7    (b) For every dollar invested by a covered institution in 8an eligible minority-owned financial manager, venture capital 9firm, or minority-led startup, the State Treasurer shall 10provide a matching contribution of up to 50 cents per dollar 11using existing funds managed by the State Treasurer. 12    (c) Investments that exceed annual performance benchmarks, 13as determined by historical market returns for venture capital 14or institutional portfolios, shall receive an additional 25 15cents per dollar in matching funds from the State Treasurer. 16    (d) An institution whose participating portfolio 17underperforms the benchmarks for a period more than 5 years 18may be prohibited from participating in the program until the 19institution can demonstrate significant improvement with 20performance above the benchmark for 8 consecutive quarters. 21    (e) The matching funds provided in accordance with this 22Section shall be: 23        (1) capped at $10,000,000, subject to available State 24    resources; 25        (2) restricted to investments made in firms or 26    businesses based in this State with significant operations   HB2937- 5 -LRB104 11833 SPS 21923 b1    in this State; and 2        (3) allocated based on a review and selection process 3    established by the State Treasurer by rule. 4    (f) To be eligible to participate in this program, covered 5institutions shall allocate at least 20% of their investment 6portfolios to: 7        (1) minority-owned venture capital firms; 8        (2) minority-led startups; 9        (3) minority-owned financial managers; or 10        (4) special investment initiatives supporting diverse 11    founders, including: 12            (A) university startup incubator programs aimed at 13        supporting underrepresented entrepreneurs; and 14            (B) nonprofit business accelerator programs 15        providing mentorship, training, and resources for 16        minority founders. 17    (g) All qualifying investments shall serve the purpose of 18fostering diversity, equity, and inclusion in this State's 19financial and entrepreneurial ecosystem. 20    (h) All participating covered institutions shall submit 21documentation of qualifying investments, including detailed 22reporting on recipients' diversity status and operations in 23this State. 24    Section 20. Administration. The State Treasurer shall 25administer the Direct Matching Funds Program, including:   HB2937- 6 -LRB104 11833 SPS 21923 b1        (1) verifying eligibility of institutions and 2    recipients; 3        (2) distributing matching funds to qualifying 4    institutions; 5        (3) publishing an annual report detailing the matching 6    funds distributed, recipients, and outcomes, including 7    jobs created, capital raised, and economic impact; and 8        (4) reallocate unused matching funds at the end of the 9    fiscal year proportionally among participating 10    institutions based on documented investment needs. 11    Section 25. Transparency and reporting. 12    (a) A covered institution participating in the program 13shall submit an annual report to the State Treasurer, 14including: 15        (1) the total value of their endowments or investment 16    portfolios; 17        (2) the percentage of investments allocated to 18    minority-owned venture capital firms, minority-owned 19    financial managers, minority-led startups, and special 20    investment initiatives; 21        (3) the names of minority-owned financial managers, 22    venture firms, and startups supported; and 23        (4) year-over-year changes in investment diversity. 24    (b) The State Treasurer shall make the reports submitted 25under subsection (a) publicly accessible, including detailed   HB2937- 7 -LRB104 11833 SPS 21923 b1scorecards that ranks institutions based on the percentage of 2investments allocated to minority-owned financial managers, 3venture capital firms, startups, and special investment 4initiatives. 5    (c) A special investment initiative receiving funds under 6this Act shall submit an annual performance report to the 7State Treasurer, including: 8        (1) the number and percentage of minority-led startups 9    supported; and 10        (2) outcomes such as capital raised, jobs created, and 11    businesses launched. 12    Section 30. Oversight and compliance. 13    (a) The State Treasurer shall oversee the implementation 14and enforcement of this Act, including the collection and 15publication of reports. 16    (b) The State Treasurer may conduct audits of covered 17institutions and special investment initiatives to ensure 18compliance with this Act. A covered institution participating 19in the program shall comply with an audit conducted by the 20State Treasurer. 21    (c) An institution that participates in this program shall 22meet reporting and compliance standards to retain program 23eligibility. 24    (d) An institution that fails to meet the 20% investment 25allocation requirement over 2 consecutive years shall lose   HB2937- 8 -LRB104 11833 SPS 21923 b1eligibility to participate in the program for a period of no 2more than 5 years. 3    (e) An institution that fails to meet reporting 4requirements or misuses matching funds may be required to 5repay any funds distributed under this Act. 6    Section 35. Confidentiality. The State Treasurer may 7redact sensitive or proprietary financial information that 8does not further the intent of this Act. 9    Section 40. Rulemaking. No later than 6 months after the 10effective date of this Act, the State Treasurer shall adopt 11any rules necessary to implement this Act. 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 132026.